Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB550.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1104 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1104. Statement of financial interests required to be filed.* * *(a.1) Statewide official and member of the General Assembly.--Beginning May 1, 2026, and each May 1 thereafter, a Statewide official and member of the General Assembly shall file electronically the statement of financial interests required under subsection (a). The filing must be in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.* * *Section 2. Section 1107(7) of Title 65 is amended and the 12345678910111213141516171819 section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1107. Powers and duties of commission.In addition to other powers and duties prescribed by law, the commission shall:* * *(7) Compile and maintain an index, including a database on its publicly accessible Internet website, of all reports and statements filed with the commission to facilitate public access to such reports and statements and instruct other State and local agencies which receive and file financial interest statements in the maintenance of systems, including publicly accessible Internet websites, which facilitate public access to such statements. The database required under this paragraph shall be searchable and sortable by, at a minimum, the following:(i) The name of the individual filing the report or statement.(ii) The office held by the individual filing the report or statement.(iii) The year the form was filed.(iv) Whether or not the form is an amended filing.The database required under this paragraph shall be operational no later than May 1, 2026.(7.1) Connect an amended filing to the original filing on its publicly accessible Internet website in a way that a person accessing one will be notified of the existence of the other.(7.2) Provide an e-mail notification option for a person who would like to be notified of new filings.* * *20250SB0550PN0567 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of 65 Pa.C.S. § 1107(7) shall take effect in 180 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0550PN0567 - 3 - 12345